Hawaii statutes.
[§27-44.2] Data set licensing.
The chief information officer may make the departments' electronic data sets on
data.hawaii.gov available to third parties pursuant to a license, which may
require the licensee to allow any user to copy, distribute, display, or create
derivative works at no cost and with an appropriate level of conditions placed
on the use. [L 2013, c 263, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next